Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-128
Legislature; make appropriations.

Beginning in 1987, the Legislature shall make appropriations for the expenses of state government during the regular session held in each odd-numbered year for the biennium beginning July 1 of such year and ending June 30 of the next succeeding odd-numbered year.

Laws 1986, LB 258, § 1.